Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1411.01
Director; enforcement powers.

The director may use the provisions of the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act for purposes of enforcing the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 36.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.